Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.900

Community economic revitalization board—Evaluations of financial assistance—Reporting of evaluations.

(1) The community economic revitalization board shall conduct biennial outcome-based evaluations of the financial assistance provided under this chapter. The evaluations shall include the following:

(a) Information on the number of applications for community economic revitalization board assistance;

(b) The number and types of projects approved;

(c) The grant or loan amount awarded each project;

(d) The projected number of jobs created or retained by each project;

(e) The actual number and cost of jobs created or retained by each project;

(f) The wages and health benefits associated with the jobs;

(g) The amount of state funds and total capital invested in projects;

(h) The number and types of businesses assisted by funded projects;

(i) The location of funded projects;

(j) The transportation infrastructure available for completed projects;

(k) The local match and local participation obtained;

(l) The number of delinquent loans;

(m) The number of project terminations; and

(n) Certain information identifying the biennial total number, percentage, and dollar amount of projects' use of: Businesses certified by the office of minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW and department of veterans affairs under chapter 43.60A RCW, and businesses not yet certified with these organizations but that self-report as meeting the requirements of certification.

(2) The evaluations may also include additional performance measures and recommendations for programmatic changes.

(3) The evaluation must be presented to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31st of each even-numbered year.

[ 2023 c 93 s 3; 2014 c 112 s 109; 2008 c 327 s 9; 1993 c 320 s 8; 1987 c 422 s 10; 1985 c 446 s 25; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 93: See note following RCW 43.160.060.

Effective date—2008 c 327 ss 1, 2, 4-11, 17: See note following RCW 43.160.010.

Effective date—1993 c 320 s 8: "Section 8 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 12, 1993]." [ 1993 c 320 s 12.]